Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.060

Administration of oaths—Powers as to witnesses, papers, books, etc.—Subpoenas.

Each member of the commission, and any special master appointed by the commission, may administer oaths. The commission may summon and examine witnesses and compel the production and examination of papers, books, accounts, documents, records, certificates, and other evidence for the determination of any issue before or the discharge of any duty of the commission. The commission shall also issue subpoenas at the request and on behalf of any judge or justice under inquiry. All subpoenas shall be signed by a member of the commission or a special master appointed by the commission. Subpoenas shall be served and witnesses reimbursed in the manner provided in civil cases in superior court.

[ 1981 c 268 s 7.]